Missouri, session 2026, HB2276.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Chapter 137, RSMo, is amended by adding thereto one new section, to be
known as section 137.109, to read as follows:
137.109. 1. This section shall be known and may be cited as the "Missouri
Disabled Veterans Homestead Exemption".
2. As used in this section, the following terms mean:
(1) "Commission", the state tax commission;
(2) "Homestead", the same meaning given to such term under section 135.010;
(3) "Qualified residence", real property used as a homestead, less any portion of
that property that is used for commercial purposes, with an equalized assessed value of
less than two hundred fifty thousand dollars that is the primary residence of a veteran
with a disability. When a veteran rents out property, or a portion of the property, to
another person for more than six months, it is presumed to be used for commercial
purposes;
(4) "Surviving spouse", the living spouse of a qualified deceased veteran. A
qualified deceased veteran is a deceased veteran who:
(a) Obtained an exemption under this section prior to his or her death;
(b) Was killed in the line of duty at any time prior to the expiration of the
application period in effect for the exemption for the tax year in which the exemption is
sought;
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.

HB 2276 2
(c) Did not obtain an exemption under this section before death but who would
have qualified for the exemption under this section in the tax year for which the
exemption is sought if he or she had survived, and whose spouse has been a resident of
Missouri from the time of the veteran's death through the tax year for which the
exemption is sought; or
(d) Died and whose death was determined to be service-connected but who
would not otherwise qualify under paragraphs (a), (b), or (c) of this subdivision, if the
spouse:
a. Is certified by the United States Department of Veterans Affairs as a recipient
of dependency and indemnity compensation under federal law at any time prior to the
expiration of the application period in effect for the exemption for the tax year for which
the exemption is sought; and
b. Remains eligible for that dependency and indemnity compensation as of
January first of the tax year for which the exemption is sought;
(5) "Veteran with a disability" or "veteran with a service-connected disability",
a Missouri resident who has served as a member of the Armed Forces of the United
States on active duty or state active duty, a member of a state National Guard, or a
member of the United States Reserve Forces and who has received an honorable
discharge and who:
(a) Has a service-connected disability as certified by the United States
Department of Veterans Affairs;
(b) Is liable for paying property taxes on a qualified residence; and
(c) Is an owner of record of the qualified residence that is occupied as his or her
principal residence and for which he or she is liable for the payment of property taxes.
3. In addition to all other exemptions authorized under Article X, Section 6 of
the Constitution of Missouri or otherwise authorized by law, and as authorized under
Article X, Section 6(a) of the Constitution of Missouri, for all tax years beginning on or
after January 1, 2027, an annual exemption is granted for property that is used as a
qualified residence by a veteran with a disability, limited to the amounts set forth as
follows:
(1) For veterans with a service-connected disability of fifty percent or more but
less than seventy percent, as certified by the United States Department of Veterans
Affairs, the annual exemption is two thousand five hundred dollars;
(2) For veterans with a service-connected disability of seventy percent or more
but less than one hundred percent, as certified by the United States Department of
Veterans Affairs, the annual exemption is five thousand dollars;

HB 2276 3
(3) For veterans with a service-connected disability of one hundred percent, as
certified by the United States Department of Veterans Affairs, the annual exemption is
equal to one hundred percent of the tax assessed on the qualified residence; and
(4) For a taxpayer who is the surviving spouse of a veteran whose death was
determined to be service-connected and who is certified by the United States
Department of Veterans Affairs as a recipient of dependency and indemnity
compensation under federal law, the annual exemption is equal to one hundred
percent of the tax assessed on the qualified residence.
4. If an exemption is granted under this section and the person awarded the
exemption subsequently becomes a resident of a facility licensed under chapter 198, a
Missouri veterans' home as defined under section 42.002, or a facility operated by the
United States Department of Veterans Affairs, the exemption shall continue:
(1) If the residence continues to be occupied by the qualifying person's spouse;
or
(2) If the residence remains unoccupied but is still owned by the person who
qualified for the exemption.
5. The exemption under this section carries over to the benefit of the veteran's
surviving spouse as long as the spouse holds the legal or beneficial title to the qualified
residence, permanently resides therein, and does not remarry. If the surviving spouse
sells the property, an exemption not to exceed the amount granted from the most recent
ad valorem tax roll may be transferred to his or her new residence as long as it is used as
his or her primary residence and he or she does not remarry. No exemption shall be
allowed for the tax year in which the surviving spouse remarries.
6. The exemption and determination of eligibility under this section applies for
tax years beginning on or after January 1, 2027. The claim for an exemption shall not
be transferred or assigned, except as provided for under this section.
7. (1) Except as otherwise provided in this subsection, each taxpayer who has
been granted an exemption under this section shall reapply on an annual basis. A
taxpayer shall apply for the exemption by filing an application during the application
period in effect for the county of his or her residence. The assessor or chief county
assessment officer may determine the eligibility of residential property to receive the
exemption provided by this section by application, visual inspection, questionnaire, or
other reasonable methods. The determination shall be made in accordance with
guidelines established by the commission. If a veteran has a combined service-
connected disability rating of one hundred percent and is deemed to be permanently
and totally disabled, as certified by the United States Department of Veterans Affairs,
the taxpayer who has been granted an exemption under this section shall no longer be

HB 2276 4
required to reapply for the exemption on an annual basis, and the exemption shall be in
effect for as long as the exemption would otherwise be permitted under this section.
(2) If the person qualifying for the exemption does not occupy the qualified
residence as of January first of the tax year, the exemption granted under this section
shall be prorated on a monthly basis. The prorated exemption shall apply beginning
with the first complete month in which the person occupies the qualified residence.
8. The exemption granted under this section shall not affect the process of setting
the tax rate as required under Article X, Section 22 of the Constitution of Missouri and
section 137.073 in any prior, current, or subsequent tax year.
100 9. The commission may promulgate all necessary rules and regulations for the
101 administration of this section. Any rule or portion of a rule, as that term is defined in
102 section 536.010, that is created under the authority delegated in this section shall
103 become effective only if it complies with and is subject to all of the provisions of chapter
104 536 and, if applicable, section 536.028. This section and chapter 536 are nonseverable
105 and if any of the powers vested with the general assembly pursuant to chapter 536 to
106 review, to delay the effective date, or to disapprove and annul a rule are subsequently
107 held unconstitutional, then the grant of rulemaking authority and any rule proposed or
108 adopted after August 28, 2026, shall be invalid and void.
109 10. No rule promulgated by the commission shall in any way adversely impact,
110 interrupt, or interfere with the performance of the required statutory duties of any
111 county elected official when performing such duties as deemed necessary for the
112 purposes of this section and the distribution of all other real and personal property
113 taxes.
114 11. Under section 23.253 of the Missouri sunset act:
115 (1) The provisions of this section shall sunset six years after the effective date of
116 this section unless reauthorized by an act of the general assembly; and
117 (2) This section shall terminate on January first of the calendar year
118 immediately following the calendar year in which the provisions of this section are
119 sunset.
✔